District of Columbia statutes.
47-340.10

District officials.

(a)

The elected or appointed officials, officers, employees, or agents of the District shall not be liable personally for the payment of the bonds or be subject to any personal liability by reason of the issuance of the bonds, or for any representations, warranties, covenants, obligations, or agreements of the District contained in this subchapter, the bonds, the financing documents, or the closing documents.

(b)

The signature, countersignature, facsimile signature, or facsimile countersignature of any official appearing on the bonds, the financing documents, or the closing documents shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes, notwithstanding the fact that the official ceases to be that official before delivery of the bonds, the financing documents, or the closing documents.

Sept. 20, 1995, D.C. Law 11-46, § 11, 42 DCR 3603
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-340.10.